public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX 70 r endo/P7N0 [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX 70 r ende/P7N0 [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX 70 r ento/P7N0 [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX 70 r èntogeƚo/Q7 [^cijɉñ]ir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T7 + nto
