public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
aƚienar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
strangosar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:stra
armar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
asionar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
baxotar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
baƚestrar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
banketar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
bardeveƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rabaterò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:bàter dp:ad dp:re
baxucar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
dexberlar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
inbestiar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
xbiavir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
birikinar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xboatar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
inbokar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
inbonbegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
bortir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7@0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xbragesonar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
dexbrenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
xbrodoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
bruskinar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xbunigoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
cakerar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
aparceñerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:aparcéñer dp:a
cokexar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
davañar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
indianbarnar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
docar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
dexdoronar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
produxerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1.0	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:prodúxer dp:pro
xeñerixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
arxonxerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1@0-0-1:0+0	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:arxónxer dp:re dp:ad
supeditar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sora
erpegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
exeguir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fabregar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fantastegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
deifegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:dio
femenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fermar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
sfiabexar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
fikar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fiskaƚixar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
desfogonar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
sformar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7^6^1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
frakasar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
parafraxar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:para
fugasar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ganbarar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ingavetar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
gradüar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xgrendenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
ingrutoƚir/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
infioketar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
jeƚomarar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7Vp	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kadenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kaneƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
karatarixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inkateɉar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
kijar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
komodar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skopeƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
kosparar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kroƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skufiotar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
kusoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ƚapidar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7-0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
reƚegar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
lixerir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
lodar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ƚumentar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
makuƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
maridar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
imaxinar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
meretar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
misturar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
moroxar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
mutiƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ninar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xñifar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
operar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
paeƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
papixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
patentar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
repeƚerò/t070p474J1I1	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:espèƚer dp:re
inparnigar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
piaɉar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
piñokar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
spoejar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
spontacar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
prexentar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
desputar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
raxir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ringiñar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rosir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
konsagrar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
scamasar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
seƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
dexiderar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:de
skalpoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skriturar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
soñar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
sperimentar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
movestar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xFxGxH	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:move
kostitüir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ko
istromentar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
sufrajar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
taƚianar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
tavarnar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
aparteñerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:apartèñer dp:per dp:ad
stiracar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
intortoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
stravïar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
tüar/t0l070n0t2P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
insendroƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
sixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
sufoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
vagexar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
dexvegrar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
rivarir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
dexvïar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
visar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
vorxar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xñakar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
